South Dakota, session 2026, HB1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-26-18 be AMENDED:
1-26-18. Opportunity must be afforded all parties to respond and present evidence
on issues of fact and argument on issues of law or policy. However, each agency, upon
the motion of any party, may dispose of any defense or claim:
(1) If the pleadings, depositions, answers to interrogatories, and admissions on file,
together with the affidavits, if any, show that there is no genuine issue as to any
material fact and a party is entitled to a judgment as a matter of law; or
(2) At the close of the evidence offered by the proponent of the defense or claim, if
the agency determines that the evidence offered by the proponent of the defense
or claim is legally insufficient to sustain the defense or claim.
A party to a contested case proceeding may appear in person or by counsel, or
both; may be present during the giving of all evidence; may obtain the services of a
translator or interpreter as provided in chapter 19-3, with the translator or interpreter's
compensation fixed, paid, and collected as provided in sections 2 and 3 of this Act; may
have reasonable opportunity to inspect all documentary evidence; may examine and
cross-examine witnesses; may present evidence in support of the party's interest; and
may have subpoenas issued to compel attendance of witnesses and production of evidence
in the party's behalf.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-26:
When a witness or party needs a language interpreter or translator in a contested
case proceeding, the agency required by law to determine the matter, as referenced in
subdivision 1-26-1(2), shall procure and appoint a disinterested interpreter or translator.

26.156.10 2 1219
The agency shall compensate the interpreter or translator for reasonable and just services
provided in the proceeding. The payment for the services of the interpreter or translator
must be made from moneys appropriated for the operation of the agency.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-26:
The prevailing party in a contested case proceeding may recover expenditures, for
interpreter or translator services necessarily incurred in gathering and procuring evidence
or bringing the contested case, which are not otherwise covered pursuant to section 2 of
this Act.
HB1219 ENROLLED

26.156.10 3 1219
An Act to require the provision of interpreter or translator services for parties to an
administrative contested case.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1219
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1219 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1219 ENROLLED